Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2010.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 304(a) of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 304. Revised or successor codes.(a) Duties of department.--* * *(5) The department shall promulgate regulations adopting the standards for requiring automatic fire sprinkler systems in one-family and two-family dwellings as set forth in section R313.2 (relating to one- and two-family dwellings 1234567891011121314151617181920 automatic fire sprinkler systems) of the International Residential Code (2009 edition), and any successor triennial revisions.* * *Section 2. Section 901(g) of the act is repealed:Section 901. Exemptions.* * *[(g) Automatic fire sprinkler systems in one-family and two-family dwellings.--(1) Section R313.2 (relating to one- and two-family dwellings automatic fire sprinkler systems) of the International Residential Code (2009 edition), and any successor triennial revisions, is excluded from this act and shall not be part of Chapter 3.(2) A builder of a one-family or two-family dwelling subject to the International Residential Code shall, at or before the time of entering into the purchase contract, do all of the following:(i) Offer to a buyer the option to install or equip, at the buyer's expense, an automatic fire sprinkler system in the building or dwelling unit designed and installed in accordance with the provisions of section R313.2.1 (relating to design and installation) of the International Residential Code (2009 edition).(ii) Provide the buyer with information which explains the initial and ongoing cost of installing and equipping an automatic fire sprinkler system in the building or dwelling unit.(iii) Provide the buyer with information, as made available by the State Fire Commissioner on the agency's 20250HB2010PN2564 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Internet website, on the possible benefits of installing an automatic sprinkler system.]* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2010PN2564 - 3 - 1234